test/src/dict-gt-yamls/N-kiargus_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



  Noun - kiärgus: # 2A d -kk, rg > r'g
    kiärgus+N+Sg+Nom: kiärgus
    kiärgus+N+Sg+Gen: kiär´gus
    kiärgus+N+Sg+Acc: kiär´gus
    kiärgus+N+Sg+Ill: kiä'rgusân
    kiärgus+N+Sg+Loc: kiä'rgusist
    kiärgus+N+Sg+Com: kiä'rgusáin
    kiärgus+N+Sg+Abe: kiärgusttáá
    kiärgus+N+Ess: [kiä'rgusin, kiärgusin]
    kiärgus+N+Par: [kiä'rgusid, kiärgusid]
    kiärgus+N+Pl+Nom: kiä'rguseh
    kiärgus+N+Pl+Gen: kiä'rgusij
    kiärgus+N+Pl+Acc: kiä'rgusijd
    kiärgus+N+Pl+Ill: kiä'rgusáid
    kiärgus+N+Pl+Loc: kiä'rgusijn
    kiärgus+N+Pl+Com: kiä'rgusijguin
    kiärgus+N+Pl+Abe: kiä'rgusijttáá
